District of Columbia statutes.
16-2336

Unlawful disclosure of records; penalties.

Whoever willfully discloses, receives, makes use of, or knowingly permits the use of information concerning a child or other person in violation of sections 16-2331 through 16-2335 , shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be fined of not more than the amount set forth in [§ 22-3571.01] or imprisoned not more than ninety days, or both. Violations of this section shall be prosecuted by the Corporation Counsel in the name of the District of Columbia.

July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 543, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 121(a)
Sept. 23, 1977, D.C. Law 2-22, title IV, § 408(a), 24 DCR 3341
Apr. 30, 1988, D.C. Law 7-104, § 4(q), 35 DCR 147
June 11, 2013, D.C. Law 19-317, § 281(c), 60 DCR 2064
This section is referenced in § 16-2316, § 16-2331, and § 16-2332.
1981 Ed., § 16-2336.
1973 Ed., § 16-2336.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-317 substituted “of not more than the amount set forth in [§ 22-3571.01]” for “not more than $250”.
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 281(c) of the Criminal Fine Proportionality Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-45, April 1, 2013, 60 DCR 5400, 20 DCSTAT 1300).
Applicability of D.C. Law 19-317: Section 401 of D.C. Law 19-317 provided that the act shall apply only to offenses committed on or after June 11, 2013.